Hawaii statutes.
[§150A-11] Enforcement. Inspectors
shall enforce the provisions of this chapter and related rules promulgated by
the department.

Inspectors shall be provided with suitable
badges or insignia of office by the department, and shall have power to serve
and execute warrants in all matters relating to the quarantine laws, to issue a
citation for any violation of this chapter and related rules, and to seize
contraband articles throughout the State. [L 1985, c 133, §6]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next